Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 6.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-406
Limitation on metal beer keg purchase or receipt.

No secondary metals recycler shall purchase or receive a metal beer keg, including those kegs made of stainless steel, if the serial number or other identifying insignia has been destroyed, removed, altered, covered, or defaced.

Laws 2008, LB766, § 6.